Florida, session 2026, SB368.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 28 29 Section 1.âSubsection (5) of section 409.903, Florida 30 Statutes, is amended to read: 31 409.903âMandatory payments for eligible persons.âThe agency 32 shall make payments for medical assistance and related services 33 on behalf of the following persons who the department, or the 34 Social Security Administration by contract with the Department 35 of Children and Families, determines to be eligible, subject to 36 the income, assets, and categorical eligibility tests set forth 37 in federal and state law. Payment on behalf of these Medicaid 38 eligible persons is subject to the availability of moneys and 39 any limitations established by the General Appropriations Act or 40 chapter 216. 41 (5)âA pregnant woman for the duration of her pregnancy and 42 for the postpartum period consisting of the 12-month period 43 beginning on the last day of her pregnancy, or a child under age 44 1, if either is living in a family that has an income that is at 45 or below 185 percent of the most current federal poverty level. 46 Such a person is not subject to an assets test. Further, a 47 pregnant woman who applies for eligibility for the Medicaid 48 program through a qualified Medicaid provider must be offered 49 the opportunity, subject to federal rules, to be made 50 presumptively eligible for the Medicaid program. 51 (a)âQualified Medicaid providers that may conduct 52 presumptive eligibility determinations for Medicaid for pregnant 53 women include, but are not limited to, hospitals participating 54 in the Medicaid program; federally qualified health centers; 55 birth centers; nonprofit maternal and child health 56 organizations, such as healthy start coalitions; clinics 57 operating under the Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for 58 Women, Infants, and Children; and local housing authorities, 59 provided such entities have met the applicable training and 60 certification standards established by the department for such 61 purpose. The department shall ensure such providers are 62 adequately trained and monitored for compliance with federal and 63 state requirements relating to presumptive eligibility 64 determinations. 65 (b)âFor pregnant women deemed presumptively eligible under 66 this subsection, the agency shall provide such coverage under 67 the Medicaid program for the maximum period allowable under 68 federal law or until a full Medicaid eligibility determination 69 is made, whichever occurs earlier. 70 (c)âPregnant women deemed presumptively eligible under this 71 subsection are entitled to coverage of all medically necessary 72 services under the Medicaid program, including, but not limited 73 to, services provided by specialists and subspecialists needed 74 to comanage high-risk pregnancies, including for issues outside 75 the scope of general obstetrics. All prior authorization 76 approvals granted before or during the presumptive eligibility 77 period remain valid for the duration of such period to ensure 78 continuity of care and to reduce the risk of adverse maternal or 79 infant health outcomes. 80 Section 2.âWithin 60 days after this act becomes a law, the 81 Agency for Health Care Administration shall seek federal 82 approval to extend the allowable period of presumptive Medicaid 83 eligibility for pregnant women to 180 days under s. 409.903, 84 Florida Statutes, and the agency and the Department of Children 85 and Families, as applicable, shall initiate any necessary 86 rulemaking to implement the amendments made by this act to s. 87 409.903, Florida Statutes. 88 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.